th: ประเภทสื่อศิลปะเล็บ: ผงอะคริลิก; บิวเดอร์เจล; ดิปพาวเดอร์; ยาทาเล็บเจล; ฮาร์ดเจล; กลิตเตอร์ผง; ผงเม็ดสี; โพลีเจล; เพชรเทียม; สติกเกอร์; อื่นๆ
en: Nail art medium type: Acrylic powder; Builder gel; Dip powder; Gel polish; Hard gel; Loose glitter; Pigment powder; Poly gel; Rhinestones; Stickers; Other
pl: Typ nośnika do zdobienia paznokci: Puder akrylowy; Żel budujący; Puder dip; Lakier żelowy; Żel twardy; Sypki brokat; Puder pigmentowy; Żel polimerowy; Cyrkonie; Naklejki; Inne
ro-RO: Tip de mediu pentru artă pe unghii: Pudră acrilică; Gel de construcție; Pudră de imersie; Ojă gel; Gel dur; Sclipici liber; Pudră pigment; Poligel; Ștrasuri; Autocolante; Altele
zh-CN: 美甲艺术介质类型: 丙烯酸粉末; 构建凝胶; 浸粉; 甲油胶; 硬凝胶; 散粉亮片; 色粉; 聚合凝胶; 水钻; 贴纸; 其他
hr-HR: Tip medija za umjetnost noktiju: Akrilni prah; Gel za izgradnju; Prah za uranjanje; Gel lak; Tvrdi gel; Rasuti šljokice; Pigmentni prah; Poly gel; Kamenčići; Naljepnice; Ostalo
sl-SI: Tip medija za nail art: Akrilni prah; Gradbeni gel; Dip prah; Gel lak; Trdi gel; Bleščice v prahu; Pigmentni prah; Poly gel; Okrasni kamenčki; Nalepke; Drugo
sk-SK: Typ materiálu použitého pri nechtovom dizajne: Akrylový prášok; Stavebný gél; Púder na namáčanie; Gélový lak; Tvrdý gél; Voľné glitre; Pigmentový prášok; Poly gél; Nepravé diamanty; Nálepky; Iné
ko: 네일 아트 매체 유형: 아크릴 파우더; 빌더 젤; 딥 파우더; 젤 폴리쉬; 하드 젤; 루즈 글리터; 피그먼트 파우더; 폴리 젤; 라인스톤; 스티커; 기타
da: Neglekunstmedietype: Akrylpudder; Byggegel; Dip-pudder; Gellak; Hård gel; Løst glitter; Pigmentpudder; Polygel; Rhinsten; Klistermærker; Andet
lt-LT: Nagų meno priemonės tipas: Akriliniai milteliai; Statybinis gelis; Mirkymo milteliai; Gelinis lakas; Kietas gelis; Biri blizgučiai; Pigmentų milteliai; Poligelis; Akmenukai; Lipdukai; Kita
zh-TW: 美甲藝術介質類型: 壓克力粉; 建構凝膠; 浸粉; 凝膠指甲油; 硬式凝膠; 散粉亮片; 色粉; 聚合凝膠; 水鑽; 貼紙; 其他
cs: Typ média pro nail art: Akrylátový pudr; Stavební gel; Dip powder; Gelový lak; Tvrdý gel; Volné třpytky; Pigmentový pudr; Poly gel; Štrasové kameny; Nálepky; Jiné
vi: Loại chất liệu nghệ thuật móng: Bột acrylic; Gel xây dựng; Bột nhúng; Sơn gel; Gel cứng; Kim tuyến rời; Bột màu; Poly gel; Đá quý mô phỏng kim cương; Nhãn dán; Khác
de: Nail-Art-Mediumtyp: Acrylpulver; Aufbaugel; Tauchpulver; Gellack; Hartgel; Loser Glitzer; Pigmentpulver; Polygel; Strasssteine; Sticker; Sonstiges
tr: Tırnak sanatı ortam tipi: Akrilik pudra; Yapı jeli; Daldırma pudrası; Jel oje; Sert jel; Serbest simler; Pigment pudrası; Poli jel; Suni elmaslar; Çıkartmalar; Diğer
es: Tipo de medio de arte de uñas: Polvo acrílico; Gel constructor; Polvo dip; Esmalte en gel; Gel duro; Brillo suelto; Polvo de pigmento; Poligel; Diamantes de imitación; Pegatinas; Otros
fr: Type de support pour nail art: Poudre acrylique; Gel constructeur; Poudre à tremper; Vernis gel; Gel dur; Paillettes libres; Poudre de pigment; Polygel; Strass; Autocollants; Autre
nb: Neglekunstmediumtype: Akrylpuder; Byggegel; Dip-puder; Gellakk; Hardgel; Løs glitter; Pigmentpuder; Polygel; Smykkesteiner; Klistremerker; Annet
ru: Тип материала для нейл-арта: Акриловая пудра; Строительный гель; Дип-пудра; Гель-лак; Твердый гель; Рассыпчатые блестки; Пигментная пудра; Полигель; Стразы; Наклейки; Другой
pt-BR: Tipo de meio de arte de unhas: Pó acrílico; Gel construtor; Pó de imersão; Esmalte em gel; Gel duro; Glitter solto; Pó pigmentado; Polygel; Pedras strass; Adesivos; Outro
it: Tipo di mezzo per nail art: Polvere acrilica; Gel costruttore; Polvere dip; Smalto gel; Gel duro; Glitter sfuso; Polvere pigmentata; Poly gel; Strass; Adesivi; Altro
fi: Kynsitaidetarvikkeen tyyppi: Akryylipuuteri; Rakennusgeeli; Dippipuuteri; Geelilakka; Kova geeli; Irtokinneteri; Pigmenttipuuteri; Polygeeli; Strassit; Tarrat; Muu
hu: Körömművészeti közeg típusa: Akril por; Építő gél; Dip por; Géllakk; Kemény gél; Szórt csillám; Pigment por; Poly gél; Strasszok; Matricák; Egyéb
sv: Nagelkonstmediumtyp: Akrylpuder; Byggegel; Dip-puder; Gellack; Hårdgel; Löst glitter; Pigmentpuder; Polygel; Rhinestone; Klistermärken; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de meio para arte de unhas: Pó acrílico; Gel de construção; Pó de imersão; Verniz gel; Gel duro; Glitter solto; Pó pigmentado; Poly gel; Strass; Autocolantes; Outro
bg-BG: Тип средство за ноктопластика: Акрилна пудра; Билдър гел; Дип прах; Гел лак; Твърд гел; Насипен брокат; Пигментна пудра; Поли гел; Кристали; Стикери; Други
el: Τύπος μέσου nail art: Πούδρα ακρυλικού; Τζελ δόμησης; Πούδρα εμβάπτισης; Βερνίκι τζελ; Σκληρό τζελ; Χαλαρό γκλίτερ; Πούδρα χρωστικής; Πολυ-τζελ; Στρας; Αυτοκόλλητα; Άλλο
ja: ネイルアート媒体タイプ: アクリルパウダー; ビルダージェル; ディップパウダー; ジェルポリッシュ; ハードジェル; ルースグリッター; ピグメントパウダー; ポリジェル; ラインストーン; シール; その他
nl: Nagelkunst mediumtype: Acrylpoeder; Builder gel; Dip poeder; Gellak; Harde gel; Losse glitter; Pigmentpoeder; Polygel; Standaard strass-steentjes; Stickers; Andere